Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.195

Examination—Exception for lawful work experience and training school program completion. (Expires July 1, 2026.)

(1) Until July 1, 2026, notwithstanding RCW 19.28.161(2)(a)(i) and 19.28.191(1)(c)(i), the department shall permit:

(a) A person issued an electrical training certificate to work to gain the experience required to qualify for the journey level electrician certification examination without registering in an apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW or equivalent out-of-state apprenticeship program if before July 1, 2023, the trainee has:

(i) 3,000 hours of lawful experience worked in the electrical construction trade regulated under this chapter; or

(ii) Completed a two-year training school program pursuant to RCW 19.28.191(1)(e);

(b) Electrical trainees described in (a) of this subsection to qualify for the journey level electrician certification examination without completing the work and education requirements of an apprenticeship approved under chapter 49.04 RCW or completing an equivalent out-of-state apprenticeship program. To be eligible to take the examination for a journey level certificate of competency, the applicant must demonstrate 8,000 hours of lawful experience working in the electrical construction trade regulated under this chapter. Four thousand of the hours must be new industrial or commercial electrical installations.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2026.

[ 2023 c 95 s 2; 2018 c 249 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 95: See note following RCW 19.28.191.

Effective date—2018 c 249: See note following RCW 19.28.191.